Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 127 Boards of Elections [Repealed]

127.010.
State
board of elections; membership; meetings; compensation. [Repealed.]

127.020.
Employment
of director, staff; powers, duties of state board. [Repealed.]

127.030.
County
board of elections; membership; meetings; staff in counties containing city
of first or second class. [Repealed.]

127.040.
Precinct
election officers. [Repealed.]

127.050.
Division
of county into election precincts. [Repealed.]